Montana, session 2025, HB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-2-722, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-722. Auction or lottery of mountain sheep license. (1) The commission may issue one male
mountain sheep license each year through a competitive auction or lottery. The commission shall promulgate
rules for the use of the license and conduct of the auction or lottery. A wildlife conservation organization
involved in the conservation of mountain sheep may be authorized by the commission to conduct the license
auction or lottery, in which case the authorized organization may retain proceeds of the sale, not to exceed
10%, to cover reasonable auction or lottery expenses.
(2) All proceeds remaining from the auction or lottery, whether conducted by the commission or as
otherwise authorized by the commission, must be used by the department for the substantial benefit of
mountain sheep. The proceeds from the auction must be used in addition to any other funds the department
uses for the management of mountain sheep. The department shall report the use or investment of auction or
lottery proceeds to the office of budget and program planning as a part of the information required by 17-7-111."
Section 2. Section 87-2-724, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-724. Auction or lottery of Shiras moose license. (1) The commission may issue one male
Shiras moose license each year through a competitive auction or lottery. The commission shall promulgate
rules for the use of the license and conduct of the auction or lottery. A wildlife conservation organization
involved in the conservation of moose may be authorized by the commission to conduct the license auction or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 283
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 283
lottery, in which case the authorized organization may retain up to 10% of the proceeds of the sale to cover
reasonable auction or lottery expenses.
(2) All proceeds remaining from the auction or lottery, whether conducted by the commission or as
otherwise authorized by the commission, must be used by the department for the substantial benefit of moose.
The proceeds from the auction or lottery must be used in addition to any other funds the department uses for
the management of moose."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 283
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 283, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 283
INTRODUCED BY T. RUNNING WOLF, L. SCHUBERT, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, M. LEE, P. STRAND, J.
SECKINGER, B. CLOSE, R. GREGG, J. SOOKTIS, M. CUNNINGHAM, T. MILLETT, E. MATTHEWS, S.
WEBBER, M. FOX, G. LAMMERS, T. FRANCE, D. HAWK, B. MITCHELL, S. MORIGEAU, E. STAFMAN, Z.
WIRTH, P. FIELDER, M. MARLER, S. DEMAROIS, J. HINKLE, J. LYNCH
AN ACT PERMITTING THE ISSUANCE OF MOUNTAIN SHEEP AND SHIRAS MOOSE TAGS THROUGH A
LOTTERY; AMENDING SECTIONS 87-2-722 AND 87-2-724, MCA; AND PROVIDING A DELAYED EFFECTIVE
DATE.”